Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2672.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 480. Cybersecurity Coordination Board.--(a) The following apply regarding establishment and purposes:(1) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board is established within the Office of Administration.(2) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall:(i) Collect, study and share information about cybersecurity issues and initiatives and provide advice to the Governor with respect to developing uniform cybersecurity techniques, standards, policies, procedures and best practices.(ii) Coordinate efforts with Federal, State and local government agencies, academic institutions and the private sector to promote effective cybersecurity measures for the benefit of the residents, businesses, government entities and other entities within this Commonwealth.(b) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall consist of the following members:(1) The Secretary of Administration or a designee.(2) The Attorney General or a designee.(3) The Auditor General or a designee.(4) The State Treasurer or a designee.(5) The Director of the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency or a designee.(6) The Commonwealth's Chief Information Security Officer under the Office of Administration.(7) The Director of the Governor's Office of Homeland Security or a designee.(8) One member of the Senate to be appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate or a designee.(9) One member of the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or a 20260HB2672PN3711 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designee.(10) One member of the Senate to be appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate or a designee.(11) One member of the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives or a designee.(12) The Executive Director of the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania or a designee.(13) The Executive Director for the Pennsylvania Municipal League or a designee.(14) The Executive Director for the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors or a designee.(15) The Executive Director for the Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs or a designee.(16) The Executive Director for the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Commissioners or a designee.(c) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall also include three cybersecurity experts that shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The cybersecurity experts must have professional experience in cybersecurity or information technology.(d) If a member of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board sends a designee in the member's place, the designee must have a background in cybersecurity or be the cybersecurity expert of the designating board member.(e) The Governor shall invite the following representatives of Federal agencies to serve as advisory members to the Cybersecurity Coordination Board:(1) The United States Secretary of Defense or a designee.(2) The United States Secretary of Homeland Security or a 20260HB2672PN3711 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designee.(3) The Director of the National Institute of Standards and Technology or a designee.(4) The Director of the Defense Information Systems Agency or a designee.(5) The Director of the Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity or a designee.(6) The Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or a designee.(f) The voting members of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson and secretary of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board.(g) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall, with the approval of the Governor, appoint an executive director to carry out the duties of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board. The following apply to the executive director:(1) The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board. The selection and removal of the executive director shall be made by a simple majority of the voting members of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board that constitute a quorum.(2) The executive director shall be qualified for the duties of the position, as determined by the Cybersecurity Coordination Board.(3) The executive director shall conduct the work of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board under the direction and supervision of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board.(4) The executive director shall provide a report to the Governor of the final determination of any action or inaction that the Cybersecurity Coordination Board recommends, including 20260HB2672PN3711 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any advice or information in support of or in addition to any final determination of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board.(5) A current member of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board may not serve as the executive director.(6) The executive director's appointment shall not continue beyond the expiration of this section.(7) The executive director shall be subject to the same policies and procedures as employees of the Office of Administration.(8) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall fix the compensation of the executive director, subject to the approval of the executive director.(h) The Office of Administration shall acquire staff, office space, office equipment and supplies and obtain the services of cybersecurity subject matter experts to assist the Cybersecurity Coordination Board and the executive director of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board in fulfilling the duties under this section.(i) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board and the executive director of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board may be supported by the Office of Administration's designated staff in furtherance of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board fulfilling the duties under this section.(j) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall meet no fewer than four times a year to review and assess cybersecurity, including risks, protective measures, laws, regulations, governances, technologies, standards and best practices that affect the Federal, State, county and local governments, international government, businesses and other entities. Additional meetings shall be at the discretion of the 20260HB2672PN3711 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth's Chief Information Security Officer under the Office of Administration, until an executive director of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board is appointed, after which any additional meetings shall be held at the discretion of the executive director of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board.(k) Meetings of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board shall not be held using video conferencing technology. Members of the board may use teleconferencing technology, as necessary.(l) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board may establish committees, as needed, to formulate recommended positions or actions.(m) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board, through the executive director of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board, shall provide the Governor an annual report summarizing the Cybersecurity Coordination Board's findings and assessments. The following apply:(1) The report shall include an overview of the cybersecurity landscape, changes since the prior report, issues and risks affecting the protection of information, recommendations to resolve and mitigate the issues and risks and any other relevant information deemed appropriate by the Cybersecurity Coordination Board with respect to cybersecurity.(2) The report shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure as provided under subsection (n) . (n) Deliberations, documentation, records, correspondence and all work of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board and its committees, including any actions or reports of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board, shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the requirements of the following:(1) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the 20260HB2672PN3711 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Right-to-Know Law."(2) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(o) Members of the Cybersecurity Coordination Board and its committee members shall serve without compensation except for payment of necessary and actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and in performing duties and responsibilities as members.(p) The Cybersecurity Coordination Board and its committee members, including advisory members, shall not use their position to sell products or services to the Commonwealth or benefit financially or enable their immediate family members or employers to benefit financially, whether directly or indirectly, from Commonwealth initiatives that result from recommendations or advice provided by the Cybersecurity Coordination Board under this section.(q) This section shall expire four years after the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2672PN3711 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718